src/morphology/inflection/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_BACK_CLIT
[CLIT=HAN]:han   #        ;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=KAAN]:hankaan  #        ;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=KO]:hanko #        ;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=PA]:hanpa #        ;
[CLIT=KO]:ko #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=HAN]:kohan #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=KAAN]:kokaan    #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=KIN]:kokin    #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=PA]:kopa   #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=S]:kos    #        ;
[CLIT=PA]:pa #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=HAN]:pahan #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KAAN]:pakaan    #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KIN]:pakin    #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KO]:pako   #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=S]:pas    #        ;
[CLIT=KIN]:kin  #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=HAN]:kinhan  #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=KAAN]:kinkaan #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=KO]:kinko    #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=PA]:kinpa    #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN]:kaan  #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=HAN]:kaanhan  #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=KIN]:kaankin #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=KO]:kaanko    #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=PA]:kaanpa    #        ;

LEXICON A_FRONT_CLIT
[CLIT=HAN]:hän   #        ;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=KAAN]:hänkään  #        ;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=KO]:hänkö #        ;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=PA]:hänpä #        ;
[CLIT=KO]:kö #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=HAN]:köhän #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=KAAN]:kökään    #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=KIN]:kökin    #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=PA]:köpä   #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=S]:kös    #        ;
[CLIT=PA]:pä #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=HAN]:pähän #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KAAN]:päkään    #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KIN]:päkin    #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KO]:päkö   #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=S]:päs    #        ;
[CLIT=KIN]:kin  #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=HAN]:kinhän  #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=KAAN]:kinkään #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=KO]:kinkö    #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=PA]:kinpä    #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN]:kään  #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=HAN]:käänhän  #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=KIN]:käänkin #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=KO]:käänkö    #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=PA]:käänpä    #        ;

LEXICON A_BACK_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   A_BACK_CLIT    ;

LEXICON A_FRONT_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   A_FRONT_CLIT    ;

LEXICON A_BACK_SINGULARS
0    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS       ;
0    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS      ;

LEXICON A_FRONT_SINGULARS
0    A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS       ;
0    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS      ;

LEXICON A_BACK_PLURALS
0   A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0   A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;

LEXICON A_FRONT_PLURALS
0   A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0   A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;

LEXICON A_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT
0    A_BACK_POSS   ;
0    A_BACK_POSS_AN ;
0    A_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON A_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_CLIT_OPT
0    A_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    A_FRONT_POSS_ÄN  ;
0    A_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON A_BACK_POSS_EN_CLIT_OPT
0    A_BACK_POSS   ;
0    A_BACK_POSS_EN ;
0    A_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON A_FRONT_POSS_EN_CLIT_OPT
0    A_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    A_FRONT_POSS_EN  ;
0    A_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON A_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT
0    A_BACK_POSS   ;
0    A_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON A_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT
0    A_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    A_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON A_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL
0   A_BACK_POSS  ;
0   A_BACK_POSS_EN   ;

LEXICON A_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL
0   A_FRONT_POSS  ;
0   A_FRONT_POSS_EN   ;

LEXICON A_COMPOUND_0
0   A_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON A_COMPOUND_N
0:n     A_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON A_COMPOUND_IEN
0:ien   A_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON A_COMPOUND_IDEN
0:iden  A_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON A_COMPOUND_IN
0:in    A_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON A_COMPOUND_ITTEN
0:itten A_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON A_COMPOUND_JEN
0:jen   A_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON A_COMPOUND_TEN
0:ten   A_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON A_COMPOUND
[BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][GUESS=COMPOUND]:{#}   NOMINALS  ;
